Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-202
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of sections 53-201 to 53-223, the definitions found in sections 53-203 to 53-215 shall be used.

Laws 1989, LB 371, § 2.